North Carolina, session 2025, HB750.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of two million five hundred
thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium
to be used to award grants on a competitive basis to nonprofit community health centers.
Nonprofit community health centers selected to receive these grant funds shall use all such funds
to purchase and make available long-acting reversible contraceptives for underserved, uninsured,
or medically indigent patients. As used in this section, the term "long-acting reversible
contraceptives" means a contraceptive drug or device that meets all of the following criteria:
(1) Is a method of birth control that provides effective contraception for an
extended period of time without depending upon user action.
(2) Is designed as a temporary method of birth control that the user can elect to
discontinue.
(3) Has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for
use as a contraceptive.
(4) Is obtained under a prescription written by a health care provider authorized
to prescribe medications under the laws of this State.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H750-v-1*